West Virginia, session 2026, HB4029.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 22. GOVERNMENT CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTS. §5-22-5. Notification of local governments. The public entity accepting a bid on a public construction contract, or any other type of contract, shall, where taxpayer funds are being used, notify in writing every municipality and county in which the contractor or any of its subcontractors will be performing services under the contract. The notification shall be made within seven days of acceptance of the bid. The notification shall include a brief description of the services to be provided, the identity of the contractor, including its contact information, and the approximate time the services will be performed.  The municipality or county shall publish the terms of the contract with a 30-day period in which the public may respond and comment on the contract.